Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 2. Judicial Conference of Virginia.

§ 17.1-706.
Establishment and membership.

There is hereby established the Judicial Conference of Virginia, which shall have as its active members the Chief Justice and justices of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the chief judge and judges of the Court of Appeals, all other judges of the circuit courts of the Commonwealth and all retired justices and judges of such courts. The honorary membership shall consist of the Attorney General of Virginia, the the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee and the Chairman of the
Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designee who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees, the president and secretary of the Virginia State Bar, the president and secretary of the Virginia Bar Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Trial Lawyers Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Defense Attorneys, the president and secretary of the Old Dominion Bar Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Commonwealth’s Attorneys, the president and secretary of the Virginia Women Attorneys Association, the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers, the deans of the law schools of The College of William and Mary in Virginia, University of Richmond, University of Virginia, Washington and Lee University, George Mason University, Regent University, Liberty University, and the Appalachian School of Law, and the two attorneys appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court as members of the Judicial Council. The honorary members shall not have voting privileges.

History.

1950, p. 69, § 17-228; 1964, c. 9; 1970, c. 404; 1980, c. 447; 1981, c. 231; 1984, c. 703; 1989, c. 597; 1990, c. 249; 1998, cc. 38, 872; 2008, c. 115; 2012, c. 76.

Cross references.

As to the Judicial Conference of Virginia for courts not of record, see § 16.1-218.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “The College of William and Mary in Virginia” was substituted for “The College of William and Mary” in this section to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee and the Chairman of the
Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designee” for “the Chairmen of the Courts of Justice Committees of the Senate and House of Delegates or their designees.” March 10, 2021.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 115 inserted “or their designees who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees” in the second sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 76, in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “the president and secretary of the Virginia Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers,” deleted “and” preceding “Regent University” and inserted “Liberty University, and the Appalachian School of Law.”

§ 17.1-707.
President; executive committee.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be the president of the Judicial Conference. The Conference shall be served by an executive committee composed of eight judges. The Chief Justice, or a justice of the Supreme Court designated by him, shall be chairman of the executive committee.

History.

1950, p. 70, § 17-229; 1964, c. 9; 1980, c. 178; 1987, c. 161; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-708.
Meetings.

The Conference shall meet at least once in each calendar year at the call of the president and at such other times as may be designated by him or by the executive committee for the purpose of discussing and considering means and methods of improving the administration of justice in this Commonwealth. If any active member shall for any cause be unable to attend, he shall promptly notify the president. Unless excused from attendance, it shall be the duty of each active member to attend and remain throughout the proceedings of the Conference.

History.

1950, p. 70, § 17-230; 1964, c. 9; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-709.
Expenses of members.

The active members and honorary members shall receive their reasonable expenses while in attendance at the meetings of the Conference, and of the executive committee.

History.

1950, p. 70, § 17-231; 1964, c. 9; 1998, c. 872.